New York, session 2025-2026, S10125.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 201-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 201-b. Electric vehicle charging stations. 1. Definitions. For the 4 purposes of this section: 5 a. "parking facility" shall mean a parking garage, parking structure, 6 or open parking lot that is paved and striped to designate individual 7 parking spaces for vehicles. 8 b. "electric vehicle ready infrastructure" shall have the same meaning 9 as in subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision nine of section 10 11-104 of the energy law. 11 c. "electric vehicle charging station" shall have the same meaning as 12 in subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision nine of section 13 11-104 of the energy law. 14 d. "power-based allocation method" shall mean a compliance approach 15 that allows electric vehicle charging infrastructure requirements to be 16 met based on the total kilowatt power capacity available for charging 17 electric vehicles, without mandating a specific number or type of charg- 18 ing stations. 19 2. Any parking facility owned and operated by the state of New York, 20 that offers fifty or more parking spaces for the purposes of public use, 21 state employee use and pay-per-usage, is hereby required to install a 22 minimum quantity of electric vehicle charging stations based on a 23 percentage of the total number of parking spaces offered by such facili- 24 ty or computed using the power-based allocation method, as set forth in 25 rules and regulations promulgated by the office of general services. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06145-06-6 S. 10125--A 2 1 3. a. No later than one year from the effective date of this section, 2 the office of general services shall promulgate rules and regulations to 3 ensure that any new parking facilities owned and operated by the state 4 of New York with fifty parking spaces or more shall have electric vehi- 5 cle ready infrastructure and electric vehicle charging stations in 6 accordance with subdivision two of this section; 7 b. Such rules and regulations shall: 8 (i) establish guidelines for calculating aggregate power capacity for 9 electric vehicle charging stations in parking facilities; 10 (ii) set standards ensuring equitable access to charging options for 11 various types of electric vehicles; 12 (iii) assure flexibility to select appropriate charging types based on 13 power levels; and 14 (iv) assure compliance with all applicable safety and accessibility 15 requirements. 16 c. Such rules and regulations shall not apply to: 17 (i) any repairs, alterations, or additions to a parking facility when 18 such repairs, alterations, or additions are being made to less than 19 fifty percent of such parking facility; or 20 (ii) a change of occupancy or use of parking facilities. 21 d. Such rules and regulations shall not apply to parking facilities 22 existing prior to the adoption of such rules and regulations pursuant to 23 this section. 24 4. The office of general services shall be responsible for the instal- 25 lation of any electric vehicle supply equipment and charging stations. 26 5. The office of general services may be responsible for the mainte- 27 nance, general upkeep and repair of any electric vehicle supply equip- 28 ment and charging stations. If the office of general services is unable 29 to complete such maintenance or repairs, the office may contract with a 30 licensed electrician or similar repair service to complete the necessary 31 work on said equipment. 32 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.